Florida, session 2026, SB956.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âPresent subsections (4) and (5) of section 13 768.0706, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (5) 14 and (6), respectively, and a new subsection (4) is added to that 15 section, to read: 16 768.0706âMultifamily residential property safety and 17 security; presumption against liability.â 18 (4)âThe owner or principal operator of a multifamily 19 residential property may not receive a presumption against 20 liability under this section if two or more of the following 21 crimes have been reported to have occurred at the property in 22 the 24 months preceding the subject incident: 23 (a)âMurder; 24 (b)âRobbery; 25 (c)âSexual battery; 26 (d)âAggravated assault; 27 (e)âBattery; 28 (f)âKidnapping or false imprisonment; or 29 (g)âCrimes involving a firearm. 30 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.